District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.21

Duration of an exploratory committee.

The duration of an exploratory committee shall not exceed 18 months for any one office. Once a candidate’s exploratory committee reaches the maximum duration of 18 months, the candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy and form a principal political campaign committee or terminate the exploratory committee.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 321, 59 DCR 1862